Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3867
(UTC 802) Duty of loyalty.

(UTC 802) (a) A trustee shall administer the trust solely in the interests of the beneficiaries.

(b) Subject to the rights of persons dealing with or assisting the trustee as provided in section 30-38,101, a sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the investment or management of trust property entered into by the trustee for the trustee's own personal account or which is otherwise affected by a conflict between the trustee's fiduciary and personal interests is voidable by a beneficiary affected by the transaction unless:

(1) the transaction was authorized by the terms of the trust;

(2) the transaction was approved by the court;

(3) the beneficiary did not commence a judicial proceeding within the time allowed by section 30-3894;

(4) the beneficiary consented to the trustee's conduct, ratified the transaction, or released the trustee in compliance with section 30-3898; or

(5) the transaction involves a contract entered into or claim acquired by the trustee before the person became or contemplated becoming trustee.

(c) A sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the investment or management of trust property is presumed to be affected by a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if it is entered into by the trustee with:

(1) the trustee's spouse;

(2) the trustee's descendants, siblings, parents, or their spouses;

(3) an agent or attorney of the trustee; or

(4) a corporation or other person or enterprise in which the trustee, or a person that owns a significant interest in the trustee, has an interest that might affect the trustee's best judgment.

(d) A transaction not concerning trust property in which the trustee engages in the trustee's individual capacity involves a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if the transaction concerns an opportunity properly belonging to the trust.

(e)(1) The following transactions shall not be presumed to be affected by a conflict between the personal and fiduciary interests of a trustee, if the transaction and any investment made pursuant to the transaction complies with the prudent investor rule set forth in sections 30-3883 to 30-3889 and is in the best interests of the beneficiaries:

(A) an investment by a trustee in securities of an investment company or investment trust to which the trustee or its affiliate provides services in a capacity other than as trustee; or

(B) the placing of securities transactions by a trustee through a securities broker that is part of the same company as the trustee, is owned by the trustee, or is affiliated with the trustee.

(2) In addition to the trustee's fees charged to the trust, the trustee, its affiliate, or its associated entity may be reasonably compensated for any transaction or provision of services described in this subsection performed by the trustee, its affiliate, or its associated entity. However, with respect to any investment in securities of an investment company or investment trust to which the trustee or its affiliate provides investment advisory or investment management services, the trustee shall, at least annually, notify the persons entitled under section 30-3878 to receive a copy of the trustee's annual report of the rate and method by which the compensation was determined.

(f) In voting shares of stock or in exercising powers of control over similar interests in other forms of enterprise, the trustee shall act in the best interests of the beneficiaries. If the trust is the sole owner of a corporation or other form of enterprise, the trustee shall elect or appoint directors or other managers who will manage the corporation or enterprise in the best interests of the beneficiaries.

(g) This section does not preclude the following transactions, if fair to the beneficiaries:

(1) an agreement between a trustee and a beneficiary relating to the appointment or compensation of the trustee;

(2) payment of reasonable compensation to the trustee;

(3) a transaction between a trust and another trust, decedent's estate, or conservatorship of which the trustee is a fiduciary or in which a beneficiary has an interest;

(4) a deposit of trust money in a regulated financial-service institution operated by the trustee; or

(5) an advance by the trustee of money for the protection of the trust.

(h) The court may appoint a special fiduciary to make a decision with respect to any proposed transaction that might violate this section if entered into by the trustee.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 67;

Laws 2004, LB 999, § 28;

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 44;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 27.

Unless an exception under this section applies, a trust beneficiary establishes a prima facie case of fraud by showing that a trustee's transaction benefited the trustee at the beneficiary's expense. The burden of going forward with evidence then shifts to the trustee to establish the following by clear and convincing evidence: The transaction was made under a power expressly granted in the trust and the clear intent of the settlor and the transaction was in the beneficiary's best interests. In re Estate of Hedke, 278 Neb. 727, 775 N.W.2d 13 (2009).